Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-425
Pharmacy, defined.

Pharmacy means a facility advertised as a pharmacy, drug store, hospital pharmacy, dispensary, or any combination of such titles where drugs or devices are dispensed as defined in the Pharmacy Practice Act.

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 25;

Laws 2001, LB 398, § 66;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1180.

Pharmacy Practice Act, see section 38-2801.